Hawaii statutes.
§586-5.6 Effective date. The temporary
restraining order shall be effective as of the date of signing and filing;
provided that if a temporary restraining order is granted orally in the
presence of all the parties and the court determines that each of the parties
understands the order and its conditions, if any, then the order shall be
effective as of the date it is orally stated on the record by the court until
further order of the court. Protective orders orally stated by the court on
the record shall be effective as of the date of the hearing if the respondent
attends the hearing or, if the respondent was served but failed to appear, then
upon service of the protective order upon the respondent until further order of
the court; provided that all oral protective orders shall be reduced to writing
and issued forthwith. The judiciary shall provide forms which will enable the
court to issue all temporary restraining orders forthwith. [L 1987, c 315, §6;
am L 1992, c 290, §4; am L 2011, c 85, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next